Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.043

Conversion of local improvement district into utility local improvement district.

The legislative authority of any city or town may by ordinance convert any then existing local improvement district into a utility local improvement district at any time prior to the adoption of an ordinance approving and confirming the final assessment roll of such local improvement district. The ordinance so converting the local improvement district shall provide for the payment of the special assessments levied in that district into the special fund established or to be established for the payment of revenue bonds issued to defray the cost of the local improvement in that district.

[ 1967 c 52 s 28.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.